Hawaii statutes.
[§663-1.4] Payment of reasonable attorney's
fees and costs in defense of suit. In any case brought by one health care
professional against another for defamation, damage to reputation, or any other
loss resulting from information provided by the second health care professional
in any situation relating to a medical peer review proceeding, including the
providing of information that may lead to the initiation of such a proceeding,
if the second health care professional substantially prevails in the action,
and if the action brought by the first health care professional was frivolous,
unreasonable, without foundation, or in bad faith, then the court, at the
conclusion of the action, shall award to the second health care professional
the cost of defending against the action, including a reasonable attorney's
fee. [L 1989, c 302, §1]

Cross References

Health care peer review, see chapter 671D.

Vexatious litigants, see chapter 634J.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next